src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/N-1E-jueqlghgh_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - jueʹlǧǧ: # Noun 1E-stem 'leg; foot/jalka' - full paradigm
# 
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Nom: jueʹlǧǧ
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Gen: jueʹlj
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Acc: jueʹlj
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Ill: juâlgga
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Loc: jueʹljest
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Com: juõʹljin
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Ess: jueʹlǧǧen
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Par: jueʹlǧǧed
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Abe: [jueʹljtaa, jueʹljtää]
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Nom: jueʹlj
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Gen: juõʹlji
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Acc: juõʹljid
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Ill: juõʹljid
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Loc: juõʹljin
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Com: juõʹljivuiʹm
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Abe: [juõʹljitaa, juõʹljitää]

##
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: juâlggam
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: juâlggad
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: jueʹlǧǧes
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: jueʹlǧǧem
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: jueʹlǧǧed
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: jueʹlǧǧez
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: juâlggan
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: juâlǥad
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: jueʹljes
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: jueʹlǧǧen
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: jueʹljed
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: jueʹljez
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: juâlggan
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: juâlǥad
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: jueʹljes
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: jueʹlǧǧen
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: jueʹljed
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: jueʹljez
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: juâlggsan
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: juâlggsad
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: juâlggses
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: juâlggseen
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: juâlggseed
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: juâlggseez
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: jueˈʹljstan
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: jueˈʹljstad
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: jueˈʹljstes
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: jueˈʹljsteen
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: jueˈʹljsteed
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: jueˈʹljsteez
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: juõʹljinan
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: juõʹljinad
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: juõʹljines
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: juõʹljineen
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: juõʹljineed
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: juõʹljineez
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: juâlggantää
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: juâlǥadtää
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: jueʹljestää
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: jueʹlǧǧentää
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: jueʹljedtää
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: jueʹljeztää
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Ess+PxSg1: jueʹlǧǧnan
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Ess+PxSg2: jueʹlǧǧnad
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Ess+PxSg3: jueʹlǧǧnes
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Ess+PxPl1: jueʹlǧǧneen
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Ess+PxPl2: jueʹlǧǧneed
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Ess+PxPl3: jueʹlǧǧneez
#
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: juâlggan
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: juâlǥad
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: jueʹljes
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: jueʹlǧǧen
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: jueʹljed
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: jueʹljez
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: juõʹljään
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: juõʹljääd
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: juõʹljees
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: juõʹljeen
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: juõʹljeed
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: juõʹljeez
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: juõʹljään
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: juõʹljääd
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: juõʹljees
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: juõʹljeen
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: juõʹljeed
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: juõʹljeez
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: juõʹljään
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: juõʹljääd
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: juõʹljees
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: juõʹljeen
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: juõʹljeed
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: juõʹljeez
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: juõʹljinan
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: juõʹljinad
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: juõʹljines
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: juõʹljineen
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: juõʹljineed
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: juõʹljineez
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: juõʹljäänvuiʹm
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: juõʹljäädvuiʹm
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: juõʹljeesvuiʹm
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: juõʹljeenvuiʹm
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: juõʹljeedvuiʹm
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: juõʹljeezvuiʹm
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: juõʹljääntää
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: juõʹljäädtää
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: juõʹljeestää
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: juõʹljeentää
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: juõʹljeedtää
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: juõʹljeeztää
#
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juâlǥaž
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen: juâlǥa
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc: juâlǥa
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill: juâlǥʼže
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: juâlǥast
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: juâlǥain
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe: [juâlǥataa, juâlǥatää]
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess: juâlǥʼžen
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Par: juâlǥʼžed
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom: juâlǥa
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen: juâlǥai
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc: juâlǥaid
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill: juâlǥaid
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc: juâlǥain
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com: juâlǥaivuiʹm
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe: [juâlǥaitaa, juâlǥaitää]
# according to Pekka 1991: 163--164
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: juâlǥžam
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: juâlǥžad
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: juâlǥžes
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: juâlǥžeem
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: juâlǥžeed
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: juâlǥžeez
     
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: juâlǥžan
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: juâlǥžad
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: juâlǥžes
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: juâlǥžeen
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: juâlǥžeed
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: juâlǥžeez
     
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: juâlǥžan
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: juâlǥžad
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: juâlǥžes
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: juâlǥžeen
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: juâlǥžeed
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: juâlǥžeez

     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: juâlǥžasan
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: juâlǥžasad
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: juâlǥžasas
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: juâlǥžeʹsen
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: juâlǥžeʹsed
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: juâlǥžeʹsez
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: juâˈlǥstan
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: juâˈlǥstad
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: juâˈlǥstes
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: juâˈlǥsteen
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: juâˈlǥsteed
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: juâˈlǥsteez
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: juâlǥainan
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: juâlǥainad
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: juâlǥaines
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: juâlǥaineen
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: juâlǥaineed
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: juâlǥaineez
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: juâlǥʼžantää
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: juâlǥʼžadtää
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: juâlǥʼžestää
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: juâlǥʼžeentää
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: juâlǥʼžeedtää
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: juâlǥʼžeeztää

#     
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: juâlǥʼžan
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: juâlǥʼžad
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: juâlǥʼžes
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: juâlǥʼžeen
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: juâlǥʼžeed
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: juâlǥʼžeez
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: juâlǥään
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: juâlǥääd
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: juâlǥees
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: juâlǥeen
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: juâlǥeed
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: juâlǥeez
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: juâlǥään
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: juâlǥääd
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: juâlǥees
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: juâlǥeen
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: juâlǥeed
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: juâlǥeez
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: juâlǥään
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: juâlǥääd
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: juâlǥees
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: juâlǥeen
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: juâlǥeed
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: juâlǥeez
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: juâlǥainan
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: juâlǥainad
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: juâlǥaines
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: juâlǥaineen
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: juâlǥaineed
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: juâlǥaineez
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: juâlǥäänvuiʹm
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: juâlǥäädvuiʹm
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: juâlǥeesvuiʹm
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: juâlǥeenvuiʹm
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: juâlǥeedvuiʹm
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: juâlǥeezvuiʹm
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: juâlǥääntää
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: juâlǥäädtää
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: juâlǥeestää
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: juâlǥeentää
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: juâlǥeedtää
     jueʹlǧǧ+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: juâlǥeeztää
